Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 776.105 is amended to read:
776.105. (1)  The Oregon Board of Maritime Pilots is established within the Public Utility Com-
mission of Oregon, and shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor for terms  of four
years. The appointments of members of the board are subject to confirmation by the Senate  in the
manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(2) Three members of the board shall be public members, one of  whom shall act as chairperson
of the board. Each public member must be a resident of this state.  The public members of the
board may not:
(a) During the preceding five years  or during their terms of office, have any interest in the
ownership, operation or management of any tugs,  cargo or passenger vessels or in the carriage of
freight or passengers by vessel;
(b) During the preceding five years or during their terms of office, have any interest in any  as-
sociation or organization represented under subsection (4) of this section or  principally comprised
of persons  engaged in commercial pursuits in the maritime industry as described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection in any capacity; or
(c) Hold or have held a maritime pilot license issued by any state or federal authority.
(3) Three members shall be licensees under this chapter. One member shall be a Columbia  River
bar licensee, one member shall be a Columbia River licensee and one  member shall be a Coos Bay
or Yaquina Bay licensee. At least one licensee member must be  a resident of this state.  A
licensee member shall:
(a) Have been licensed for more than three years under this chapter;  and
(b) Be actively engaged in piloting[ ; and ].
[(c) Be a resident of this state. ]
(4) Except as provided  in subsection (5) of this section, three members of the board shall, for
at least  three years immediately preceding their appointment, have been and during their terms of
office be engaged in  the activities of a person, as defined in ORS 174.100, that operates or represents
commercial oceangoing vessels.
(5) The Governor may appoint a past or present employee or commissioner of a port  to serve
on the board in lieu of one of the operators  or representatives of a commercial oceangoing vessel
under subsection (4) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 459 (SB 459-A) Page 1
(6)(a) The majority of members shall constitute a quorum  for the transaction of all business if
at least one  member of each group, as described in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section, is
present.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when  the board fixes pilotage fees under
ORS 776.115 (5) a quorum shall consist of seven members.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, for  purposes of ORS 192.610 to 192.705 a
quorum shall consist of five members.
(7) The commission may appoint a member of the commission, or a designee, as  a nonvoting, ex
officio member of the board.
(8)(a) The commission is  responsible for the administrative oversight of the board. The respon-
sibilities of the commission include, but are not limited to:
(A) Budgeting;
(B) Financial management;
(C) Record keeping;
(D) Staffing;
(E) Purchasing and contracting;
(F) Collecting fees; and
(G) Compliance with rulemaking procedures set forth in ORS chapter 183.
(b) In consultation with the board, the commission shall:
(A) Fix the qualifications of and appoint an executive director and an administrative  officer for
the board; and
(B) Subject to the State Personnel Relations Law, fix the compensation  of the executive director
and the administrative officer.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 776.105 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to
members of the  Oregon Board of Maritime Pilots who are appointed or reappointed after the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding the  amendments to ORS 776.105 by section 1 of this 2025 Act, the
members of the board on the effective date of this 2025 Act may serve on the board  until the
expiration of their terms.
Passed by Senate March 25, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 459 (SB 459-A) Page 2